Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-385
Underground cables and equipment; map; filing.

Counties may require the filing with the county clerk by the person, firm, or corporation constructing, installing, operating, or maintaining such community antenna television service of a proper map showing the exact location of all underground cables and equipment, together with a statement showing the exact nature of the same.

Laws 1971, LB 257, § 3.